Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5852.
people of the state of michigan enact: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Authorized workforce development organization" means a qualified workforce development organization that has met the requirements of this article and with which the Michigan strategic fund has entered into a workforce development HOPE zone agreement for withholding tax capture revenues pursuant to this article and section 51f of the income tax act of 1967, MCL 206.51f. (b) "Chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967" means chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967, MCL 206.701 to 206.718. (c) "Commercial property" means property used for a commercial purpose as that term is defined in section 27a of the general property tax act, MCL 211.27a, except that commercial property does not include residential rental property as that term is defined in section 7ff of the general property tax act, MCL 211.7ff. (d) "Commission" means the state tax commission created by 1927 PA 360, MCL 209.101 to 209.107. (e) "Department" means the department of treasury. (f) "General property tax act" means the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. (g) "Homestead facility" means that term as defined in section 2 of the neighborhood enterprise zone act, 1992 PA 147, MCL 207.772. (h) "HOPE zone" means a HOPE zone designated under section 11. (i) "HOPE zone certificate or agreement" means a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate or a workforce development HOPE zone agreement. (j) "HOPE zone tax" means the HOPE zone tax levied under section 27. (k) "Income tax act of 1967" means the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.1 to 206.847. Sec. 5. As used in this act: (a) "Local governmental unit" means a city, village, or township. (b) "Michigan economic development corporation" means that term as defined in section 4 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2004. (c) "Michigan strategic fund" means the Michigan strategic fund created in section 5 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2005. (d) "Neighborhood capture" means the portion of the HOPE zone tax paid for a homestead facility that is deposited into the neighborhood HOPE zone fund under section 27(5)(a). (e) "Neighborhood HOPE zone certificate" means a certificate issued under section 23. (f) "Neighborhood HOPE zone fund" means the neighborhood HOPE zone fund created in section 37. (g) "Participating business" means a business that meets both of the following requirements: (i) Is located and conducts business activity within a HOPE zone. (ii) Enters into a withholding tax capture agreement. (h) "Qualified downtown revitalization district" means an area located within 1 or more of the following: (i) The boundaries of a downtown district as that term is defined in section 201 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4201. (ii) The boundaries of a principal shopping district or a business improvement district as those terms are defined in section 1 of 1961 PA 120, MCL 125.981. (iii) The boundaries of an area in a qualified local governmental unit that is zoned and primarily used for business as determined by the qualified local governmental unit. (i) "Qualified local governmental unit" means a local governmental unit that meets 1 of the following requirements: (i) Has a median household income of $60,000.00 or less, as determined by the Michigan strategic fund. (ii) Has a poverty rate of not less than 20%, as determined by the Michigan strategic fund. (j) "Qualified neighborhood" means a neighborhood that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, the neighborhood contains not less than 10 platted parcels of land. A neighborhood located in a qualified downtown revitalization district may contain less than 10 platted parcels if the platted parcels together contain 10 or more homestead facilities. (ii) All the land within the neighborhood is compact and contiguous. Contiguity is not broken by a road, right-of-way, or property purchased or taken under condemnation if the purchased or condemned property was a single parcel before the sale or condemnation. (k) "Qualified neighborhood organization" means an entity that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is a homeowners or property owners association organized on a membership basis. (ii) Is incorporated in this state under the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192, and is in good standing. (iii) Is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(4) or (7) or 528 of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501 and 528. (iv) Represents a qualified neighborhood. (l) "Qualified workforce development organization" means an entity that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is incorporated in this state under the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192, and is in good standing. (ii) Is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501. (iii) Meets 1 of the following requirements: (A) Is a local economic development corporation. (B) Has as 1 of its primary purposes supporting workforce development. (C) Is an alliance of local businesses that includes businesses within the HOPE zone. Sec. 7. As used in this act: (a) "Represented qualified neighborhood" means the qualified neighborhood represented by the qualified neighborhood organization. (b) "State school aid act" means the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1896. (c) "State school aid fund" means the state school aid fund established by section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (d) "Withholding tax" means the income tax withheld under chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967. (e) "Withholding tax capture agreement" means an agreement between a business that is located and conducts business activity within HOPE zone and a qualified workforce development organization that includes all of the following provisions: (i) A provision that the business agrees that the withholding tax attributable to its employees that work within the HOPE zone may be captured. (ii) A provision that the business agrees to file the required returns and reports under chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967 with the department. (iii) A provision that the business agrees to comply with methods and processes developed by the state treasurer that are necessary for the business to annually report the amount of withholding tax attributable to its employees that work within the HOPE zone. (iv) A provision that describes the workforce development purposes for which the qualified workforce development organization may use the withholding tax capture revenues. (f) "Withholding tax capture revenues" means the amount of withholding tax each calendar year that is attributable to individuals employed by participating businesses. (g) "Workforce development HOPE zone agreement" means a workforce development HOPE zone agreement executed under section 41. (h) "Workforce development HOPE zone fund" means the workforce development HOPE zone fund created in section 45. (i) "Workforce development HOPE zone program" means the workforce development HOPE zone program created under section 41. ARTICLE 2. HOPE ZONES Sec. 11. (1) Subject to subsections (2) to (5), the governing body of a qualified local governmental unit, by resolution, may designate 1 or more HOPE zones within that qualified local governmental unit. (2) All of the following requirements apply to HOPE zones: (a) The total acreage of HOPE zones designated by a qualified local governmental unit may not exceed 25% of the total acreage contained within the boundaries of the qualified local governmental unit. (b) An area designated as a renaissance zone under the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2681 to 125.2696, may not be included in a HOPE zone. (c) The duration of a HOPE zone may not exceed 15 years. (3) Not less than 60 days before the passage of a resolution designating a HOPE zone or the repeal or amendment of a resolution under subsection (7), the clerk of the qualified local governmental unit must give written notice to the assessor, the governing body of each taxing unit that levies ad valorem property taxes in the proposed HOPE zone, the commission, the department, and the Michigan strategic fund. (4) Before acting on the resolution, the governing body of the qualified local governmental unit must do all of the following: (a) Obtain a determination from the Michigan strategic fund that the local governmental unit is a qualified local governmental unit. The Michigan strategic fund shall respond to a request for a determination under this subdivision not later than 30 days after receipt of the request. (b) Adopt a statement of the qualified local governmental unit's goals, objectives, and policies relative to neighborhood preservation and revitalization and economic development within the proposed HOPE zone. (c) Hold a public hearing, which must occur not later than 45 days after the date the notice is sent under subsection (3). (5) The resolution must include all of the following information: (a) Subject to subsection (2)(c), the duration of the HOPE zone. (b) A statement that persons and property within the HOPE zone are exempt from taxes levied by that qualified local governmental unit to the extent provided by this act. (c) The criteria that must be met for a qualified neighborhood organization to receive a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate for the represented qualified neighborhood. (d) The criteria that must be met for a qualified workforce development organization to receive the approval of the governing body of the qualified local governmental unit of the capture of withholding tax capture revenues required under section 41(4)(e). (6) On receipt of a notice under subsection (3), the assessor shall determine and furnish to the governing body of the qualified local governmental unit the amount of the true cash value of the property located within the proposed HOPE zone and any other information considered necessary by the governing body. (7) A resolution may be repealed or amended not sooner than 3 years after the date of adoption or of the most recent amendment of the resolution by the governing body of the qualified local governmental unit. The repeal or amendment of the resolution takes effect 6 months after adoption. However, all of the following apply to an action taken under this subsection: (a) The action does not invalidate a HOPE zone certificate or agreement. (b) A represented qualified neighborhood for which a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate is in effect continues to be included in the total acreage limitations under this section until the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate is expired or revoked. (c) A participating business whose withholding taxes are being captured under a workforce development HOPE zone agreement continues to be included in the total acreage limitations under this section until the workforce development HOPE zone agreement is no longer in effect. (8) As used in this section, "resolution" means the resolution of the governing body of the qualified local governmental unit under subsection (1). Sec. 13. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 15, an individual who is a resident of a HOPE zone and a business that is located and conducts business activity within a HOPE zone shall receive the exemption provided in section 5 of the city utility users tax act, 1990 PA 100, MCL 141.1155, for the period provided in the resolution under section 11(5)(a). (2) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 15, a business that is located and conducts business activity within a HOPE zone and an employee of a business that is located and conducts business activity within a HOPE zone may receive the deduction provided in section 35 of chapter 2 of the city income tax act, 1964 PA 284, MCL 141.635, for the period provided the resolution under section 11(5)(a). (3) Except as otherwise provided in section 15, commercial property located in a HOPE zone is exempt from the collection of taxes under all of the following: (a) Section 7ff of the general property tax act, MCL 211.7ff. (b) Section 11 of 1974 PA 198, MCL 207.561. (c) Section 12 of the commercial redevelopment act, 1978 PA 255, MCL 207.662. (d) Section 21c of the enterprise zone act, 1985 PA 224, MCL 125.2121c. (e) Section 1 of 1953 PA 189, MCL 211.181. (f) Section 12 of the technology park development act, 1984 PA 385, MCL 207.712. (g) Section 51105 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.51105. (4) During the last 3 years that the taxpayer is eligible for an exemption or deduction described in subsection (1), (2), or (3), the exemption or deduction shall be reduced by the following percentages: (a) For the tax year that is 2 years before the final year of designation as a HOPE zone, 25%. (b) For the tax year immediately preceding the final year of designation as a HOPE zone, 50%. (c) For the tax year that is the final year of designation as a HOPE zone, 75%. (5) If a portion of a HOPE zone is included within a transformational brownfield plan under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, on the request of the owner of the real property located within the applicable portion of the HOPE zone and the qualified local governmental unit that designated the HOPE zone, and the approval of the Michigan strategic fund, subsection (2) does not apply within that portion of the HOPE zone. The election under this subsection is effective only if the revenues to be collected as a result of the election will be transmitted pursuant to a transformational brownfield plan as provided in section 13c(13) of the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2663c. Sec. 15. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4), a taxpayer is not eligible for an exemption or deduction under section 13 for that taxable year if 1 or more of the following apply: (a) The taxpayer is delinquent on December 31 of the prior tax year under 1 or more of the following: (i) The Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1519. (ii) The income tax act of 1967. (iii) 1974 PA 198, MCL 207.551 to 207.572. (iv) The commercial redevelopment act, 1978 PA 255, MCL 207.651 to 207.668. (v) The enterprise zone act, 1985 PA 224, MCL 125.2101 to 125.2123. (vi) 1953 PA 189, MCL 211.181 to 211.182. (vii) The technology park development act, 1984 PA 385, MCL 207.701 to 207.718. (viii) Part 511 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.51101 to 324.51120. (ix) The neighborhood enterprise zone act, 1992 PA 147, MCL 207.771 to 207.786. (x) The city utility users tax act, 1990 PA 100, MCL 141.1151 to 141.1177. (b) The taxpayer is substantially delinquent as defined in a written policy by the qualified local governmental unit in which the HOPE zone is located on December 31 of the prior tax year under 1 or both of the following: (i) The city income tax act, 1964 PA 284, MCL 141.501 to 141.787. (ii) Taxes, fees, and special assessments collected under the general property tax act. (c) An individual is eligible for an exemption or deduction under section 13 until the department determines that the aggregate state and local tax revenue forgone as a result of all exemptions and deductions granted under this act to that individual reaches $5,000,000.00. (2) A casino located and conducting business activity within a HOPE zone is not eligible for an exemption or deduction under section 13. Real property in a HOPE zone on which a casino is operated, personal property of a casino located in a HOPE zone, and all property associated or affiliated with the operation of a casino is not eligible for an exemption or deduction under section 13. As used in this subsection, "casino" means a casino or a parking lot, hotel, motel, or retail store owned or operated by a casino, an affiliate, or an affiliated company, regulated by this state pursuant to the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. (3) An individual shall not be denied an exemption or deduction under subsection (1) because the individual failed to file a return on or before December 31 of the prior tax year under subsection (1)(a)(ii) if that individual was entitled to a refund under that act. (4) A business that is located and conducts business activity within a HOPE zone shall not be denied an exemption or deduction under subsection (1) because the business failed to file a return on or before December 31 of the prior tax year under subsection (1)(a)(i) or (ii) if that business had no tax liability under that act for the tax year for which the return was not filed. ARTICLE 3. NEIGHBORHOOD HOPE ZONE CERTIFICATES Sec. 21. (1) A qualified neighborhood organization located in a HOPE zone may file an application for a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate with the clerk of the qualified local governmental unit. The application must be filed in the form and manner prescribed by the commission. The clerk of the qualified local governmental unit shall provide a copy of each application to the assessor for the qualified local governmental unit. (2) The application must include all of the following information: (a) A description of the represented qualified neighborhood, including all homestead facilities within the represented qualified neighborhood. (b) A plan for the use of the neighborhood capture that complies with section 29. (c) Any other information required by the qualified local governmental unit. (3) Not later than 60 days after receipt of an application under subsection (1), the governing body of the qualified local governmental unit, by resolution, shall determine whether to approve the application and notify the applicant in writing of its determination. If approved, the clerk shall forward a copy of the application and the resolution approving the application to the assessor for the qualified local governmental unit. Sec. 23. (1) Subject to subsection (2), not later than 60 days after receipt of an approved application under section 21, the assessor for the qualified local governmental unit shall determine whether the application complies with this article. Subject to subsection (3), if the assessor finds compliance, the assessor shall issue a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate to the applicant and send a certified copy of the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate to each affected taxing unit, the commission, and the department. The assessor shall keep the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate filed on record in the assessor's office. Notice of the assessor's refusal to issue a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate must be sent by certified mail to the same persons. (2) The assessor of the qualified local governmental unit shall not issue a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate unless all of the following requirements are met: (a) The applicant meets the requirements of the definition of qualified neighborhood organization in section 5. (b) Each homestead facility included in the application meets the requirements of the definition of homestead facility in section 3. (c) The represented qualified neighborhood is not located, in whole or in part, in a neighborhood enterprise zone designated under the neighborhood enterprise zone act, 1992 PA 147, MCL 207.771 to 207.786. (d) The criteria for receiving a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate included in the resolution under section 11(5)(c) are met. (3) A neighborhood HOPE zone certificate must be in the form prescribed by the commission and include all of the following: (a) The name of the qualified neighborhood organization. (b) The legal description of the represented qualified neighborhood. (c) A statement that unless revoked under this act, the certificate remains in effect for the period stated in the certificate. Sec. 25. (1) Beginning the calendar year after the effective date of the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate and until the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate expires, the qualified neighborhood organization shall file an annual report by December 31st of each year with the assessor of the qualified local governmental unit that contains all of the following information: (a) Identification of any properties within the represented qualified neighborhood that previously qualified as homestead facilities but no longer qualify. (b) Identification of any properties within the represented qualified neighborhood that did not previously qualify as homestead facilities but now qualify. (c) The amount of the neighborhood capture spent in the immediately preceding year and the purposes for which the money was spent. (d) Certification that the qualified neighborhood organization continues to meet the requirements of the definition of qualified neighborhood organization in section 5. (e) Any other information required by the assessor. (2) The assessor shall keep the annual report filed on record in the assessor's office and shall provide a copy to the commission. Sec. 27. (1) There is levied on the owner of a homestead facility in a represented qualified neighborhood for which a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate is in effect a specific tax known as the HOPE zone tax. (2) A homestead facility in a represented qualified neighborhood for which a HOPE zone certificate is in effect, but not the land on which the homestead facility is located, is exempt from ad valorem real property taxes collected under the general property tax act. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the amount of the HOPE zone tax on a homestead facility is an amount equal to the total number of mills collected under the general property tax act for the current year by all taxing jurisdictions within which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (4) The HOPE zone tax is an annual tax, payable at the same times, in the same installments, and to the same officer or officers as taxes collected under the general property tax act are payable. (5) The officer or officers shall disburse the HOPE zone tax received for a homestead facility each year as follows: (a) 1 of the following amounts, as applicable, must be disbursed to the state treasurer for deposit in the neighborhood HOPE zone fund: (i) Unless subparagraph (ii), (iii), or (iv) applies, an amount equal to the sum of the following: (A) One half the number of mills levied for operating purposes by the qualified local governmental unit in which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (B) One half the number of mills levied for operating purposes by the county in which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (ii) In the year 2 years before the year in which the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate expires, the sum of both of the following: (A) Three eighths the number of mills levied for operating purposes by the qualified local governmental unit in which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (B) Three eighths the number of mills levied for operating purposes by the county in which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (iii) In the year before the year in which the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate expires, the sum of both of the following: (A) One fourth the number of mills levied for operating purposes by the qualified local governmental unit in which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (B) One fourth the number of mills levied for operating purposes by the county in which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (iv) In the year in which the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate expires, the sum of both of the following: (A) One eighth the number of mills levied for operating purposes by the qualified local governmental unit in which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (B) One eighth the number of mills levied for operating purposes by the county in which the homestead facility is located multiplied by the current taxable value of the homestead facility not including the land. (b) The remainder after the distribution under subdivision (a) must be disbursed to the state, cities, townships, villages, school districts, counties, and authorities at the same times and in the same proportions as required for the disbursement of taxes collected under the general property tax act. (6) The officer or officers shall send a copy of the amount of disbursement made to each unit under subsection (5)(b) to the commission on a form provided by the commission. (7) The HOPE zone tax is a lien on the real property on which homestead facility is located until paid. (8) If payment of the HOPE zone tax is not made by the March 1 following the levy of the tax, the tax must be turned over to the county treasurer and collected in the same manner as a delinquent tax under the general property tax act. Sec. 29. (1) Not later than March 15 of each year, the department shall distribute to each qualified neighborhood organization that holds a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate the sum of the neighborhood captures received from homestead facilities within the represented qualified neighborhood for taxes levied in the immediately preceding calendar year. The department shall distribute delinquent neighborhood captures received after March 15 as soon as practical after receipt. (2) A qualified neighborhood organization may use the money received under subsection (1) only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Construction and maintenance of community public recreation facilities for the purpose of addressing the recreational needs of local residents, including, but not limited to, playgrounds, parks, greenways, sports fields and courts, and community, youth, and senior centers. (b) Neighborhood maintenance, beautification, and infrastructure improvements. (c) Establishment and maintenance of 1 or more of the following: (i) Bike lanes. (ii) Water trails. (iii) Pedestrian infrastructure, including, but not limited to, sidewalks, trails, walkways, and pedestrian bridges. (d) Maintenance, repair, and supplies for schools located within the HOPE zone. (e) Purchase of blighted or abandoned properties to be repurposed into recreational, residential, or infrastructural assets for the neighborhood. (f) One-time investments in essential services located within the HOPE zone. (g) Remediation, rehabilitation, repair, or services for a residential lot within the HOPE zone that otherwise threatens the health, quality of life, or environmental health of the neighborhood, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) Pest control. (ii) Water line maintenance and replacement. (iii) Sewer line maintenance and replacement. Sec. 31. (1) The effective date of a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate is December 31 in the year in which the application is approved. (2) Unless revoked under section 33, a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate remains in effect for 6 to 15 years from the effective date of the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate as determined by the governing body of the qualified local governmental unit. Sec. 33. (1) On receipt of a request to revoke a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate sent by certified mail to the assessor of the qualified local governmental unit by the qualified neighborhood organization that holds a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate, the assessor, by order, shall revoke the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate. (2) If the qualified neighborhood organization fails to file the annual report under section 25, the assessor of the qualified local governmental unit, by order, shall revoke the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate. However, if the annual report is filed before the revocation is effective, the assessor, on application of the qualified neighborhood organization, shall rescind the order of revocation. If the annual report is filed after revocation of the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate, the assessor, on application of the qualified neighborhood organization, shall reinstate the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate for the remaining period of time for which the original neighborhood HOPE zone certificate would have been in effect. (3) If the qualified neighborhood organization no longer meets the requirements of the definition of qualified neighborhood organization in section 5, the assessor of the qualified local governmental unit, by order, shall revoke the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate. However, if the qualified neighborhood organization provides evidence that it complies with the requirements of the definition of qualified neighborhood organization in section 5 before the revocation is effective, the assessor, on application of the qualified neighborhood organization, shall rescind the order of revocation. If evidence that it complies with the requirements of the definition of qualified neighborhood organization in section 5 is provided after revocation of the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate, the assessor, on application of the qualified neighborhood organization, shall reinstate the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate for the remaining period of time for which the original neighborhood HOPE zone certificate would have been in effect. (4) If the qualified neighborhood organization uses the neighborhood capture for a purposes that is not allowed under section 29, the assessor of the qualified local governmental unit, by order, shall revoke the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate. However, if the qualified neighborhood organization repays the misspent funds from money from a source other than the neighborhood capture before the revocation is effective, the assessor, on application of the qualified neighborhood organization, shall rescind the order of revocation. If the misspent funds are repaid from money from a source other than the neighborhood capture after revocation of the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate, the assessor, on application of the qualified neighborhood organization, shall reinstate the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate for the remaining period of time for which the original neighborhood HOPE zone certificate would have been in effect. (5) The revocation is effective beginning the December 31 following the date of the order. The assessor shall send by certified mail copies of the order of revocation to the holder of the certificate, the commission, the department, and the governing body of each taxing unit that levies taxes on property in the qualified local governmental unit in which the represented qualified neighborhood is located. Sec. 35. (1) The assessor of each qualified local governmental unit in which is located a represented qualified neighborhood for which a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate is in effect shall determine annually, with respect to each homestead facility within the represented qualified neighborhood, the assessed valuation of the property comprising the homestead facility and the amount of ad valorem property tax that would have been paid with respect to each homestead facility under the general property tax act if the neighborhood HOPE zone certificate had not been in force, and the assessed valuation on which the HOPE zone tax is based. The owner of a homestead facility within a represented qualified neighborhood for which a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate is in effect shall furnish to the assessor the information necessary for the determination. (2) After making a determination under subsection (1) with respect to a homestead facility, the assessor shall notify the governing body of each taxing unit that levies taxes on property in the qualified local governmental unit in which the homestead facility is located, the commission, the department, the owner of the homestead facility, and the qualified neighborhood organization of the assessor's determination. The notice must be sent by certified mail not later than October 15 and must be based on the valuation as of the immediately preceding December 31. Sec. 37. (1) The neighborhood HOPE zone fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received under section 27(5)(a) or from any other source in the neighborhood HOPE zone fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the neighborhood HOPE zone fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the neighborhood HOPE zone fund. (3) Money in the neighborhood HOPE zone fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the neighborhood HOPE zone fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the neighborhood HOPE zone fund for audits of the fund. (5) The department shall expend money from the neighborhood HOPE zone fund, on appropriation, only to distribute neighborhood captures to qualified neighborhood organizations in accordance with this act. Sec. 39. (1) Not later than June 15 of each year, the assessor of each qualified local governmental unit that issues a neighborhood HOPE zone certificate shall file with the commission a report that contains all of the following information for the immediately preceding calendar year: (a) The number of certificates issued. (b) The date of issuance of each certificate. (c) The name and address of the holder of each certificate. (d) The legal description of the real property of the qualified neighborhood for which each certificate was issued. (e) The total taxable value of the homestead facilities in the represented qualified neighborhood for which a certificate was issued. (f) For each certificate that was revoked under section 33, all of the following: (i) The reason for the revocation. (ii) The date of the revocation. (iii) The name and address of the holder of each certificate that was revoked. (g) The impact on neighborhood preservation and revitalization in the qualified local governmental unit, including the estimated neighborhood captures for all new and current neighborhood HOPE zone certificate holders. (2) A report required by this section must be prepared by the local assessor on a form provided by the commission. The commission may require that the report be filed in an electronic format prescribed by the commission. (3) Not later than October 15 each year, the commission shall review and evaluate the information contained in the report described in subsection (1) and submit a report based on that evaluation to all of the following: (a) Each house of the legislature. (b) The chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. (c) The chairperson of the senate standing committee on economic development. (d) The chairperson of the senate standing committee on finance, insurance, and consumer protection. (e) The chairperson of the house of representatives standing committee on economic competitiveness. (f) The chairperson of the house of representatives standing committee on finance. (4) The report required under subsection (3) must also include specific recommendations for any changes considered necessary in this act. ARTICLE 4. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT HOPE ZONE AGREEMENTS Sec. 41. (1) The Michigan strategic fund shall create and operate the workforce development HOPE zone program to authorize the transfer of the dedicated portion of withholding tax capture revenues to qualified workforce development organizations for the purposes described in subsection (2). The Michigan strategic fund shall develop and use a detailed application, approval, and compliance process for the program that is published and available on the website of the Michigan strategic fund or the Michigan economic development corporation. The application must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) A list of participating businesses and copies of the withholding tax capture agreements. (b) A plan for the use of the withholding tax capture revenues for workforce development that complies with subsection (2). (c) An explanation of why the development of the particular skills or talents identified in the plan under subdivision (b) is necessary to support businesses within the HOPE zone and how the current workforce is deficient in meeting these business needs. (d) The amount of withholding tax capture revenues proposed to be captured. (2) A qualified workforce development organization may apply to the Michigan strategic fund to enter into a workforce development HOPE zone agreement that authorizes the payment of withholding tax capture revenues to the qualified workforce development organization under this article. An authorized workforce development organization may use the withholding tax capture revenues only for the following purposes: (a) To provide training grants to individuals to receive training at a community college or trade school in this state in 1 or more skills or talents that are needed by businesses within the HOPE zone. If the training will lead to a degree, licensure, or certification, any course necessary to receive the degree, licensure, or certification is considered training in 1 or more skills or talents that are needed by businesses within the HOPE zone. (b) To pay for the administrative expenses incurred by the authorized workforce development organization in operating the grant program. However, the amount used under this subdivision may not exceed 5% of the withholding tax capture revenues received by the authorized workforce development organization. (3) The Michigan strategic fund may request information, in addition to that contained in the application, if needed to permit the Michigan strategic fund to discharge its responsibilities under this article. (4) After receipt of an application, the Michigan strategic fund may enter into a written agreement with a qualified workforce development organization under this article, if the Michigan strategic fund determines and documents that all of the following requirements are met: (a) The applicant meets the requirements of the definition of qualified workforce development organization in section 5. (b) The applicant's proposed use of the withholding tax capture revenues will do all of the following: (i) Provide workforce development through the award of training grants to individuals to receive training at a community college or trade school in this state in 1 or more skills or talents that are needed by businesses within the HOPE zone. (ii) Benefit the residents of the HOPE zone by increasing opportunities for employment and strengthening the local economy. (iii) Comply with the requirements of this article. (iv) Comply with the withholding tax capture agreements. (c) The participating businesses have executed withholding tax capture agreements. (d) The participating businesses are located and conduct business within the HOPE zone. (e) The governing body of the qualified local governmental unit in which the HOPE zone is located approves, by resolution, the capture of the withholding tax capture revenues by the applicant for the purposes stated in the application. (5) If the Michigan strategic fund determines that the qualified workforce development organization satisfies all of the requirements of subsection (4), subject to subsections (6) and (7), the Michigan strategic fund shall determine the amount and duration of the withholding tax capture revenues to be authorized under this article and shall enter into a workforce development HOPE zone agreement as provided in this section. (6) Both of the following provisions apply to the Michigan strategic fund's determination of the amount and duration of the withholding tax capture revenues: (a) The duration may not exceed 10 years or the remaining duration of the HOPE zone, whichever is less. (b) In determining the amount and duration, the Michigan strategic fund shall consider all of the following factors: (i) The size of the workforce needed by participating businesses. (ii) Whether the proposed training will lead to a degree, licensure, or a professional or technical certification. (iii) Whether the participating businesses will make a good-faith effort to employ individuals that complete the training. (iv) Whether the average annual wage of the jobs for which the trained individuals will qualify exceeds the prosperity region average wage. As used in this subparagraph, "prosperity region average wage" means the average annual wage for the prosperity region where the HOPE zone is located based on the most recent data made available by the Michigan bureau of labor market information and strategic initiatives. (v) The potential impact of the workforce development on the economy of this state. (7) The amount of withholding tax capture revenues certified to be paid to a qualified workforce development organization shall be reduced by 5%, which shall be retained by the Michigan strategic fund for additional administrative expenses under this article as provided under section 43(4). (8) A workforce development HOPE zone agreement between a qualified workforce development organization and the Michigan strategic fund must be in writing and must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) A description of the skills and talents that training may be provided to develop. (b) A requirement that the qualified workforce development organization use the withholding tax capture revenues received only to provide training grants to individuals to pay for training in the skills and talents described in subdivision (a). (c) A requirement that the training occur at a community college or trade school in this state. (d) An estimate of the amount of withholding tax capture revenues expected to be generated for each calendar year of the duration of the written agreement. (e) A statement by the qualified workforce development organization that a violation of the written agreement may result in the revocation of the designation as an authorized workforce development organization, the loss or reduction of future withholding tax capture revenue payments under this article, or the repayment of withholding tax capture revenues received under this article. (f) A statement by the qualified workforce development organization that a misrepresentation in the application may result in the revocation of the designation as an authorized workforce development organization and the repayment of withholding tax capture revenues received under this article plus a penalty equal to 10% of the withholding tax capture revenues received under this article. (g) A provision that the qualified workforce development organization must ensure that participating businesses do all of the following: (i) File the required returns and reports under chapter 17 of the income tax act of 1967 with the department. (ii) Comply with methods and processes developed by the state treasurer that are necessary for a participating business to annually report the amount of withholding tax attributable to its employees that work within the HOPE zone. The state treasurer shall develop the methods and processes described in this subparagraph. (iii) Provide any other information reasonably requested by the Michigan strategic fund or the department. (h) The maximum amount of withholding tax capture revenues that the authorized workforce development organization may capture before the 5% reduction for administrative expenses described in section 43(4). (i) The period for which withholding tax capture revenues may be captured. (j) An audit provision that allows the Michigan strategic fund to verify that the terms and conditions of the agreement have been met. (k) A provision that the qualified workforce development organization must provide any information necessary for the Michigan strategic fund to comply with the reporting requirements under section 47 and any other information reasonably requested by the Michigan strategic fund. (9) On execution of a workforce development HOPE zone agreement, a qualified workforce development organization is an authorized workforce development organization. The fund shall provide a copy of each written agreement to the department. On execution of the written agreement, the transfer and payment of withholding tax capture revenues as specified in this article and in the workforce development HOPE zone agreement is binding on this state. The state treasurer shall calculate, for each workforce development HOPE zone agreement received under this subsection, the amount of withholding tax capture revenues collected from employees of participating businesses that work within the HOPE zone and the percentage of that amount that needs to be transferred from the general fund and deposited, in accordance with section 51f of the income tax act of 1967, MCL 206.51f, into the workforce development HOPE zone fund, from which the Michigan strategic fund shall issue payments to the authorized workforce development organization in accordance with section 43. Sec. 43. (1) An authorized workforce development organization is eligible to receive withholding tax capture revenue payments as provided in this article and the workforce development HOPE zone agreement. (2) The Michigan strategic fund shall issue a withholdings certificate each calendar year to an authorized workforce development organization that states all of the following: (a) That the qualified workforce development organization is an authorized workforce development organization. (b) The amount of withholding tax capture revenues to be paid from the workforce development HOPE zone fund for the designated calendar year. (c) The name of each participating business. (d) The federal employer identification number or the Michigan treasury number assigned to each participating business. (3) The Michigan strategic fund shall provide the department with a copy of each withholdings certificate issued under this section. On receipt of a withholdings certificate, an authorized workforce development organization may request a payment from the workforce development HOPE zone fund by filing a copy of the withholdings certificate with the Michigan strategic fund. The Michigan strategic fund shall issue the withholding tax capture revenue payment from the workforce development HOPE zone fund not later than 90 days after receipt of the request for payment from the authorized workforce development organization. (4) The Michigan strategic fund shall retain an amount equal to 5% of the withholding tax capture revenue payments authorized for that year. The Michigan strategic fund shall use the amount described in this subsection to pay for the additional administrative expenses it incurs under this article. (5) As a condition of being an authorized workforce development organization, an authorized workforce development organization authorizes the Michigan strategic fund to identify the authorized workforce development organization and disclose the amount and duration of the withholding tax capture revenue payments and any other information required to be reported under section 47. Sec. 45. (1) The workforce development HOPE zone fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received under section 51f of the income tax act of 1967, MCL 206.51f, or from any other source in the workforce development HOPE zone fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the workforce development HOPE zone fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the workforce development HOPE zone fund. (3) Money in the workforce development HOPE zone fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the workforce development HOPE zone fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The Michigan strategic fund is the administrator of the workforce development HOPE zone fund for audits of the workforce development HOPE zone fund. (5) The Michigan strategic fund may expend money from the workforce development HOPE zone fund only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To make withholding tax capture revenue payments in accordance with a workforce development HOPE zone agreement not later than 90 days after receipt of a request for payment and a copy of the withholding certificate issued under section 43. (b) To distribute an amount equal to 5% of the withholding tax capture revenue payments certified under section 43 to the Michigan strategic fund to pay for the additional administrative expenses it incurs under this article. Sec. 47. (1) Not later than June 15 of each year, the Michigan strategic fund shall prepare a report that contains all of the following information for the immediately preceding calendar year: (a) The number of workforce development HOPE zone certificates issued. (b) For each workforce development HOPE zone certificate, all of the following information: (i) The date of issuance of the workforce development HOPE zone certificate. (ii) The name and address of the holder of the workforce development HOPE zone certificate. (iii) The amount and duration of the withholding tax capture revenue payments authorized. (iv) A description of the skills and talents that training may be provided to develop. (v) The number of training grants awarded. (vi) A list of the community colleges and trade schools in this state at which training occurred. (c) Money or other revenue or property returned to the workforce development HOPE zone fund, including any clawbacks and repayments due to a breach of the workforce development HOPE zone agreement. (d) The impact of the workforce development HOPE zone program on workforce development and economic development in HOPE zones. (2) The report under subsection (1) must be posted on the website of the Michigan strategic fund or the Michigan economic development corporation and must be submitted to all of the following: (a) Each house of the legislature. (b) The chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives standing committees on appropriations. (c) The chairperson of the senate standing committee on economic development. (d) The chairperson of the senate standing committee on finance, insurance, and consumer protection. (e) The chairperson of the house of representatives standing committee on economic competitiveness. (f) The chairperson of the house of representatives standing committee on finance. (3) The report required under subsection (1) must also include specific recommendations for any changes considered necessary in this act. ARTICLE 5. ADMINISTRATION Sec. 51. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the department may promulgate rules to implement this act pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (2) If the department promulgates rules regarding article 3, the department shall consult with the commission.